Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-2704.56
Purchase of certain property or fine art by museum; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of purchases of property as defined in subdivision (8) of section 51-702 or fine art by any museum as defined in subdivision (6) of section 51-702.

Laws 2006, LB 1189, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB774, § 6.